Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 2. HUMAN SERVICES AND PROTECTIVE SERVICES IN GENERAL

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 12. PENAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 12.001. PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES. (a) A person who is not licensed to practice law in Texas commits an offense if the person charges a fee for representing or aiding an applicant or recipient in procuring assistance from the state agency administering the assistance.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person advertises, holds himself or herself out for, or solicits the procurement of assistance from the state agency administering the assistance.

(c) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2336, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.003, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 12.002. UNLAWFUL USE OF FUNDS. (a) A person charged with the duty or responsibility of administering, disbursing, auditing, or otherwise handling the grants, funds, or money provided for in this title commits an offense if the person misappropriates the grants, funds, or money or by deception or fraud wrongfully distributes the grants, funds, or money to any person.

(b) An offense under this section is a felony punishable by confinement in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for a term of not less than two or more than seven years.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2336, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.113, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.003, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 12.003. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION PROHIBITED. (a) Except for purposes directly connected with the administration of the assistance programs of the commission or Department of Aging and Disability Services, as applicable, it is an offense for a person to solicit, disclose, receive, or make use of, or to authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of the names of, or any information concerning, persons applying for or receiving assistance if the information is directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the commission or department or acquired by employees of the commission or department in the performance of their official duties.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2336, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.003, eff. April 2, 2015.